Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.255

Judicial officer training.

(1) To help ensure familiarity with the unique nature of protection order proceedings, and an understanding of trauma-informed practices and best practices in the use of new technologies for remote hearings, judicial officers, including persons who serve as judicial officers pro tempore, should receive evidence-based training on procedural justice, trauma-informed practices, gender-based violence dynamics, coercive control, elder abuse, juvenile sex offending, teen dating violence, domestic violence homicide prevention, and requirements and best practices for the surrender of weapons before presiding over protection order hearings. Trainings should be provided on an ongoing basis as best practices, research on trauma, and legislation continue to evolve. As a method of continuous training, court commissioners, including pro tempore commissioners, shall be notified by the presiding judge or court administrator upon revision of any decision made under this chapter.

(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the administrative office of the courts shall develop training for judicial officers on the topics listed in subsection (1) of this section, which must be provided free of charge to judicial officers.

[ 2023 c 462 s 202; 2022 c 268 s 15; 2021 c 215 s 35.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2022 c 268: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.